Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1333.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The sum of $73,093,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated from the Professional Licensure Augmentation Account within the General Fund to the Department of State for the operation of the Bureau of Professional and Occupational Affairs for the fiscal year July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026.Section 2. (a) The sum of $10,191,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated from the restricted receipts account of the State Board of Medicine for the operation of the board for the fiscal year July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026.(b) The sum of $2,553,000, or as much thereof as may be 1234567891011121314151617181920 necessary, is hereby appropriated from the restricted receipts account of the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine for the operation of the board for the fiscal year July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026.(c) The sum of $474,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated from the restricted receipts account of the State Board of Podiatry for the operation of the board for the fiscal year July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026.(d) The sum of $1,396,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated from the Athletic Commission Augmentation Account for the State Athletic Commission, as authorized by 5 Pa.C.S. § 1512 (relating to Athletic Commission Augmentation Account), for the support and operation of the commission for the fiscal year July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026.(e) Each appropriation listed in subsections (a), (b), (c) and (d) shall not be treated as an augmentation to the Department of State, a general government appropriation or any other appropriation, but shall be treated and accounted for as separate appropriations respectively.Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB1333PN1631 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021